Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB780.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 337.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Workplace
Standards under the direction and supervision of the secretary of the
Education and Labor Cabinet;
(b) "Department" means the Department of Workplace Standards in the
Education and Labor Cabinet;
(c) 1. "Wages" includes any compensation due to an employee by reason of
his or her employment, including salaries, commissions, vested vacation
pay, overtime pay, severance or dismissal pay, earned bonuses, and any
other similar advantages agreed upon by the employer and the employee
or provided to employees as an established policy. The wages shall be
payable in legal tender of the United States, checks on banks, direct
deposits, or payroll card accounts convertible into cash on demand at
full face value, subject to the allowances made in this chapter. However,
an employee may not be charged an activation fee and the payroll card
account shall provide the employee with the ability, without charge, to
make at least one (1) withdrawal per pay period for any amount up to
and including the full account balance.
2. For the purposes of calculating hourly wage rates for scheduled
overtime for professional firefighters, as defined in KRS 95A.210(8),
"wages" shall not include the distribution to qualified professional
firefighters by local governments of supplements received from the
Firefighters Foundation Program Fund. For the purposes of calculating
hourly wage rates for unscheduled overtime for professional firefighters,
Page 1 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1749
as defined in KRS 95A.210(9), "wages" shall include the distribution to
qualified professional firefighters by local governments of supplements
received from the Firefighters Foundation Program Fund;
(d) "Employer" is any person, either individual, corporation, partnership, agency,
or firm who employs an employee and includes any person, either individual,
corporation, partnership, agency, or firm acting directly or indirectly in the
interest of an employer in relation to an employee; and
(e) "Employee" is any person employed by or suffered or permitted to work for
an employer, except that:
1. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the
United States Department of Labor and a franchisee, neither a franchisee
nor a franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the
franchisor for any purpose under this chapter; and
2. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the
United States Department of Labor and a franchisor, neither a franchisor
nor a franchisor's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the
franchisee for any purpose under this chapter.
For purposes of this paragraph, "franchisee" and "franchisor" have the same
meanings as in 16 C.F.R. sec. 436.1.
(2) As used in KRS 337.275 to 337.325, 337.345, and 337.385 to 337.405, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(a) "Employee" is any person employed by or suffered or permitted to work for
an employer, but shall not include:
1. [Any individual employed in agriculture;
2. ]Any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative,
supervisory, or professional capacity, or in the capacity of outside
salesman, or as an outside collector as the terms are defined by
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1749
administrative regulations of the commissioner;
2[3]. Any individual employed by the United States;
[4. Any individual employed in domestic service in or about a private
home. The provisions of this section shall include individuals employed
in domestic service in or about the home of an employer where there is
more than one (1) domestic servant regularly employed;]
3[5]. Any individual classified and given a certificate by the commissioner
showing a status of learner, apprentice, worker with a disability,
sheltered workshop employee, and student under administrative
procedures and administrative regulations prescribed and promulgated
by the commissioner. This certificate shall authorize employment at the
wages, less than the established fixed minimum fair wage rates, and for
the period of time fixed by the commissioner and stated in the certificate
issued to the person;
4[6]. Employees of retail stores, service industries, hotels, motels, and
restaurant operations whose average annual gross volume of sales made
for business done is less than ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) for
the five (5) preceding years exclusive of excise taxes at the retail level
or if the employee is the parent, spouse, child, or other member of his or
her employer's immediate family;
5[7]. Any individual employed as a baby-sitter in an employer's home, or an
individual employed as a companion by a sick, convalescing, or elderly
person or by the person's immediate family, to care for that sick,
convalescing, or elderly person and whose principal duties do not
include housekeeping;
6[8]. Any individual engaged in the delivery of newspapers to the consumer;
7[9]. Any individual subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 7, 16, 27A,
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1749
30A, and 18A provided that the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall
have the authority to prescribe by administrative regulation those
emergency employees, or others, who shall receive overtime pay rates
necessary for the efficient operation of government and the protection of
affected employees;
8[10]. Any employee employed by an establishment which is an
organized nonprofit camp, religious, or nonprofit educational conference
center, if it does not operate for more than two hundred ten (210) days in
any calendar year;
9[11]. Any employee whose function is to provide twenty-four (24) hour
residential care on the employer's premises in a parental role to children
who are primarily dependent, neglected, and abused and who are in the
care of private, nonprofit childcaring facilities licensed by the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services under KRS 199.640 to 199.670;
10[12]. Any individual whose function is to provide twenty-four (24) hour
residential care in his or her own home as a family caregiver, family
home provider, or adult foster care provider and who is approved to
provide family caregiver services to an adult with a disability through a
contractual relationship with a community board for mental health or
individuals with an intellectual disability established under KRS
210.370 to 210.460 or through a contractual relationship with a certified
waiver provider as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(5), or is certified or
licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to provide adult
foster care;
11[13]. A direct seller as defined in Section 3508(b)(2) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986; or
12[14]. Any individual whose function is to provide behavior support
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1749
services, behavior programming services, case management services,
community living support services, positive behavior support services,
or respite services through a contractual relationship with a certified
waiver provider, as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(5), pursuant to a
1915(c) home and community based services waiver program, as
defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(2);
(b)[ "Agriculture" means farming in all its branches, including cultivation and
tillage of the soil; dairying; production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting
of any agricultural or horticultural commodity; raising of livestock, bees,
furbearing animals, or poultry; and any practice, including any forestry or
lumbering operations, performed on a farm in conjunction with farming
operations, including preparation and delivery of produce to storage, to
market, or to carriers for transportation to market;
(c)] "Gratuity" means voluntary monetary contribution received by an employee
from a guest, patron, or customer for services rendered;
(c)[(d)] "Tipped employee" means any employee engaged in an occupation in
which he or she customarily and regularly receives more than thirty dollars
($30) per month in tips; and
(d)[(e)] "U.S.C." means the United States Code.
Section 2. KRS 337.020 is amended to read as follows:
Every employer doing business in this state shall, as often as semimonthly, pay to each of
its employees all wages or salary earned to a day not more than eighteen (18) days prior
to the date of that payment. Any employee who is absent at the time fixed for payment, or
who, for any other reason, is not paid at that time, shall be paid thereafter at any time
upon six (6) days' demand. No employer subject to this section shall, by any means,
secure exemption from it. Every such employee shall have a right of action against any
such employer for the full amount of his wages due on each regular pay day. The
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1749
provisions of this section do not apply to those individuals defined in KRS
337.010(2)(a)1[2].
Section 3. KRS 342.610 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every employer subject to this chapter shall be liable for compensation for injury,
occupational disease, or death without regard to fault as a cause of the injury,
occupational disease, or death.
(2) A contractor who subcontracts all or any part of a contract and his or her carrier
shall be liable for the payment of compensation to the employees of the
subcontractor unless the subcontractor primarily liable for the payment of such
compensation has secured the payment of compensation as provided for in this
chapter. Any contractor or his or her carrier who shall become liable for such
compensation may recover the amount of such compensation paid and necessary
expenses from the subcontractor primarily liable therefor. A person who contracts
with another:
(a) To have work performed consisting of the removal, excavation, or drilling of
soil, rock, or mineral, or the cutting or removal of timber from land; or
(b) To have work performed of a kind which is a regular or recurrent part of the
work of the trade, business, occupation, or profession of such person
shall for the purposes of this section be deemed a contractor, and such other person
a subcontractor. This subsection shall not apply to the owner or lessee of land
principally used for agriculture.
(3) Liability for compensation shall not apply to injury, occupational disease, or death
to the employee if the employee willfully intended to injure or kill himself, herself,
or another.
(4) If an employee voluntarily introduced an illegal, nonprescribed substance or
substances or a prescribed substance or substances in amounts in excess of
prescribed amounts into his or her body detected in the blood, as measured by a
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1749
scientifically reliable test, that could cause a disturbance of mental or physical
capacities, it shall be presumed that the illegal, nonprescribed substance or
substances or the prescribed substance or substances in amounts in excess of
prescribed amounts caused the injury, occupational disease, or death of the
employee and liability for compensation shall not apply to the injury, occupational
disease, or death to the employee.
(5) If injury or death results to an employee through the deliberate intention of his or
her employer to produce such injury or death, the employee or the employee's
dependent as herein defined shall receive the amount provided in this chapter in a
lump sum to be used, if desired, to prosecute the employer. The dependents may
bring suit against the employer for any amount they desire. If injury or death results
to an employee through the deliberate intention of his or her employer to produce
such injury or death, the employee or the employee's dependents may take under
this chapter, or in lieu thereof, have a cause of action at law against the employer as
if this chapter had not been passed, for such damage so sustained by the employee,
his dependents or personal representatives as is recoverable at law. If a suit is
brought under this subsection, all right to compensation under this chapter shall
thereby be waived as to all persons. If a claim is made for the payment of
compensation or any other benefit provided by this chapter, all rights to sue the
employer for damages on account of such injury or death shall be waived as to all
persons.
(6) Prior to issuing any building permit pursuant to KRS 198B.060(10), every local
building official shall require proof of workers' compensation coverage from the
builder before a permit is issued. A person who is exempt under the exception
contained in KRS 342.650(1)[(2)], and any contractor otherwise exempt from this
chapter, shall so certify to the local building official, in writing and on a form
prescribed by the commissioner, in lieu of providing proof of workers'
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1749
compensation coverage.
(7) Every employer subject to this chapter, at its principal office and such other
locations where employees customarily report for payroll and personnel matters,
shall post a notice stating the name of its workers' compensation insurance carrier
and policy number, setting forth the means to access medical care for injuries, the
employee's obligation to give notice of accidents, and such other matters
concerning the employee's rights under this chapter as may be required by the
commissioner so as to afford every employee the opportunity to become informed
about the employer's workers' compensation program. The format and contents of
the notice shall be established by the commissioner through administrative
regulation, and copies shall be provided to the employer by its insurance carrier.
Section 4. KRS 342.630 is amended to read as follows:
The following shall constitute employers mandatorily subject to, and required to comply
with, the provisions of this chapter:
(1) Any person[, other than one engaged solely in agriculture,] that has in this state one
(1) or more employees subject to this chapter.
(2) The state, any agency thereof, and each county, city of any class, school district,
sewer district, drainage district, tax district, public or quasipublic corporation, or
any other political subdivision or political entity of the state that has one (1) or
more employees subject to this chapter.
Section 5. KRS 342.650 is amended to read as follows:
The following employees are exempt from the coverage of this chapter:
(1)[ Any person employed as a domestic servant in a private home by an employer who
has less than two (2) employees each regularly employed forty (40) or more hours a
week in domestic servant employment;
(2)] Any person employed, for not exceeding twenty (20) consecutive work days, to do
maintenance, repair, remodeling, or similar work in or about the private home of the
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1749
employer, or if the employer has no other employees subject to this chapter, in or
about the premises where that employer carries on his or her trade, business, or
profession;
(2)[(3)] Any person performing services in return for aid or sustenance only, received
from any religious or charitable organization;
(3)[(4)] Any person for whom a rule of liability for injury or death is provided by the
laws of the United States, except those persons covered under Title IV, Public Law
91-173, 91st Congress, commonly referred to as the Black Lung Benefits of the
Federal Coal Mine Health and Safety Act of 1969, or as amended;
[(5) Any person employed in agriculture;]
(4)[(6)] Any person who would otherwise be covered but who elects not to be covered
in accordance with the administrative regulations promulgated by the
commissioner;
(5)[(7)] Any person participating as a driver or passenger in a voluntary vanpool or
carpool program while that person is on the way to or from his or her place of
employment. For the purposes of this subsection, carpool or vanpool means any
method by which two (2) or more employees are transported from their residences
to their places of employment;
(6)[(8)] Members of a religious sect or division that is an adherent of established
tenets or teachings by reason of which members are conscientiously opposed to
acceptance of the benefits of any public or private insurance which makes payments
in the event of death, disability, old age, or retirement, or makes payments toward
the cost of, or provides services for, medical bills, including the benefits of any
insurance system established by the Federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. secs.
301 et seq., and it is the practice, and has been for ten (10) or more years, for
members of the sect or division to make reasonable provision for their dependent
members;
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1749
(7)[(9)] Any licensed or unlicensed, commissioned, ordained or unordained, or lay
minister of religion who has no set oral or written agreement with a church or
religious organization to receive a fixed regular payment for services provided to
the church or who works no more than ten (10) hours per week;
(8)[(10)] Any caretaker of a cemetery or property owned or operated by a church or
religious organization who provides general cleanup services, including but not
limited to mowing, raking, dusting, sweeping, and mopping which could be
performed for other individuals or organizations, who works no more than ten (10)
hours per week;
(9)[(11)] A direct seller as defined in Section 3508(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986; and
(10)[(12)] Any individual whose function is to provide behavior support services,
behavior programming services, case management services, community living
support services, positive behavior support services, or respite services through a
contractual relationship with a certified waiver provider, as defined in 907 KAR
7:005 sec. 1(5), pursuant to a 1915(c) home and community based services waiver
program, as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(2).
Section 6. KRS 304.12-250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be an unfair or deceptive trade practice for a health insurance policy to
exclude coverage for a health condition based solely on the fact that the health
condition is work-related, unless the claimant is eligible for benefits under any
workers' compensation act or similar law.
(2) For purposes of this section, all employees shall be deemed to be eligible for
benefits under any workers' compensation act or similar law, except for:
(a) Any employee exempted from workers' compensation coverage pursuant to
KRS 342.650(1), (2), [(3)]or, (5)[, or (7)]; and
(b) The owner or owners of a business, including qualified partners as defined in
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1749
KRS 342.012(3).
Section 7. KRS 342.690 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If an employer secures payment of compensation as required by this chapter, the
liability of such employer under this chapter shall be exclusive and in place of all
other liability of such employer to the employee, his legal representative, husband
or wife, parents, dependents, next of kin, and anyone otherwise entitled to recover
damages from such employer at law or in admiralty on account of such injury or
death. For purposes of this section, the term "employer" shall include a "contractor"
covered by [subsection (2) of ]KRS 342.610(2), whether or not the subcontractor
has in fact, secured the payment of compensation. The liability of an employer to
another person who may be liable for or who has paid damages on account of injury
or death of an employee of such employer arising out of and in the course of
employment and caused by a breach of any duty or obligation owed by such
employer to such other shall be limited to the amount of compensation and other
benefits for which such employer is liable under this chapter on account of such
injury or death, unless such other and the employer by written contract have agreed
to share liability in a different manner. The exemption from liability given an
employer by this section shall also extend to such employer's carrier and to all
employees, officers or directors of such employer or carrier, provided the
exemption from liability given an employee, officer or director or an employer or
carrier shall not apply in any case where the injury or death is proximately caused
by the willful and unprovoked physical aggression of such employee, officer or
director.
(2) If an employer fails to secure payment of compensation as required by this chapter,
an injured employee, or his legal representative in case death results from the
injury, may claim compensation under this chapter and in addition may maintain an
action at law or in admiralty for damages on account of such injury or death,
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1749
provided that the amount of compensation shall be credited against the amount
received in such action, and provided that, if the amount of compensation is larger
than the amount of damages received, the amount of damages less the employee's
legal fees and expenses shall be credited against the amount of compensation. In
such action the defendant may not plead as a defense that the injury was caused by
the negligence of a fellow servant, that the employee assumed the risks of his
employment, or that the injury was due to the contributory negligence of the
employee.
(3) An employer shall retain all common law defenses against any action by an
employee who elects not to be covered, as provided under[ subsection (6) of] KRS
342.650(4).
(4) (a) Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United
States Department of Labor and a franchisee, neither a franchisee nor a
franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisor for
any purpose under this chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United
States Department of Labor and a franchisor, neither a franchisor nor a
franchisor's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisee for
any purpose under this chapter.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "franchisee" and "franchisor" have the same
meanings as in 16 C.F.R. sec. 436.1.
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:45 AM Jacketed